Georgia statutes. 
No action shall be sustained (1) to set aside any assessment, (2) to enjoin the governing body from making, fixing, or collecting the assessment or issuing or levying executions therefor or issuing bonds or providing for their payment, or (3) contesting the validity thereof on any grounds or for any reason other than the failure of the governing body to adopt and publish the preliminary resolution provided for in Code Section 36-39-3 in cases requiring such resolution and its publication or to give notice of the hearing of the return of the appraisers as provided for in Code Section 36-39-14, unless such action is commenced within 30 days after the passage of the ordinance making the assessment final.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 12; Code 1933, § 69-424.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

General rule is that all presumptions are in favor of validity of assessments for local improvements, and while these presumptions are not conclusive, the burden is on the party attacking the validity of an assessment to show that the assessment is invalid. City of La Grange v. Frosolona, 52 Ga. App. 232, 183 S.E. 99 (1935).

Presumption of acceptance of assessment terms. - When no objection to the assessment or prior proceedings was made by the property owner as provided in the act, and when no action was filed to enjoin the assessment or the improvement within 30 days after the passage of the ordinance making such assessment final, the property owner will be presumed to have accepted the terms thereof and to have agreed that the assessment provided for in the act may be made. City of La Grange v. Frosolona, 52 Ga. App. 232, 183 S.E. 99 (1935).

Cited in City of La Grange v. Pound, 50 Ga. App. 219, 177 S.E. 762 (1934); Carter v. City of Toccoa, 210 Ga. 167, 78 S.E.2d 487 (1953).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, § 205 et seq.

C.J.S. - 40 C.J.S., Highways, § 472. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1652, 1653, 1673.

ALR. - Validity of promise based on invalid paving assessment, 20 A.L.R. 1326.

Right to enjoin enforcement of illegal tax, local assessment, or license fee, upon joinder of several affected thereby, 32 A.L.R. 1266; 156 A.L.R. 319.

Personal liability of property owner to pay assessments for local improvements, 127 A.L.R. 551; 167 A.L.R. 1030.

Manner of enforcing special assessments against public property, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

36-39-25. Issuance of bonds; payment; interest; terms; form.

Statute text

The governing body, after the expiration of 30 days from the passage of the ordinance confirming and levying the assessment, shall, by resolution, provide for the issuance of bonds in the aggregate amount of the assessments remaining unpaid, bearing date not more than 30 days after the passage of the ordinance fixing the assessment and of such denomination as the governing body shall determine. Such bond or bonds, unless authority is thereafter granted and exercised for making them direct obligations of the municipal corporation, shall in no event become a liability of the municipal corporation or of the governing body of the municipal corporation issuing them. The bonds shall be payable in equal annual installments over the same period of years, not less than two nor more than ten, as has been fixed and provided by the governing body of the municipal corporation for the payment of the assessments in installments under Code Section 36-39-16. One installment of any such series of bonds, with interest upon the whole series to date, shall be payable on such day and at such place as may be determined by the governing body, and one installment thereof with the yearly interest upon the whole amount remaining unpaid shall be payable on the same day in each succeeding year, until all are paid. Such bonds shall bear interest at a rate not exceeding 10 percent per annum from their date until maturity, payable annually. They shall be designated as "street-improvement bonds" and on the face thereof shall recite the street or streets, the part of the street or streets, or other public places for the improvement of which they have been issued. Unless authority is thereafter granted and exercised for making them direct obligations of the municipal corporation, such bonds shall be payable solely from assessments which have been fixed upon the lots or tracts of land benefited by the improvement under authority of this chapter. The bonds shall be signed by the mayor or chairman of the board of commissioners and attested by the clerk of the governing body, shall have the impression of the corporate seal of the municipal corporation thereon, and shall have interest coupons attached. All bonds issued by authority of this chapter shall be payable at such place either within or outside this state as shall be designated by the governing body.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 10; Code 1933, § 69-417; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1539, § 2; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1078, § 2.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Street improvement bonds issued pursuant to statutory scheme contained in this chapter are not obligations of surplus of a bank as being obligation of any one obligor. 1952-53 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 7.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 72. 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, § 168.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2118 et seq.

ALR. - Assignment and transfer of government bonds, 22 A.L.R. 775.

Provision in statute or ordinance limiting rate of interest per annum as precluding requirement of payment at maximum rate at intervals of less than a year, 29 A.L.R. 1109.

Constitutional provision against impairing obligation of contract as applicable to statutes affecting rights or remedies of holders or owners of improvement bonds or liens, 97 A.L.R. 911.

Priority as between successive issues of obligations of permanently organized local improvement district, 99 A.L.R. 1488.

Liability of municipality in consequence of its inability, refusal, or failure to collect the cost of local improvements from the property benefited, 172 A.L.R. 1030.

36-39-26. Sale of bonds; delivery to contractors.

Statute text

The bonds shall be sold by the governing body at not less than par and the proceeds thereof shall be applied to the payment of the contract price and other expenses incurred pursuant to this chapter. Alternatively, such bonds in the amount that is necessary for the purpose may be turned over and delivered to the contractor at par value in payment of the amount due him on his contract, and the portion thereof which is necessary to pay other expenses incident to and incurred in providing for the improvements shall be sold or otherwise disposed of as the governing body directs.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 10; Code 1933, § 69-418.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, §§ 178 et seq., 188.

ALR. - Priority as between successive issues of obligations of permanently organized local improvement district, 99 A.L.R. 1488.

36-39-27. Disposition of proceeds from bonds remaining after payment.

Statute text

Any proceeds from the sale of the bonds remaining in the hands of the treasurer after the payment provided for in Code Section 36-39-26 shall go into the treasury of the municipal corporation as compensation for the services to be rendered by it as contemplated in this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 10; Code 1933, § 69-419.)

36-39-28. Petition for validation of ordinance establishing assessments; time; contents.

Statute text

At any time within 60 days after the assessments are finally determined and fixed, the municipal corporation may file a petition in the superior court of the county in which the municipal corporation is situated, along with a copy of the ordinance, in which petition shall be alleged the fact of the passage and approval of the ordinance, the street or part of a street affected thereby, the character of paving or other improvement intended, and the approximate estimate of the cost. The petition shall allege that the ordinance is authorized by law and that it will create a lien on all real property abutting on such street or part of a street for the payment by the owner of each lot or parcel of land so abutting of the pro rata share of expense assessed to each lot or parcel of land, as well as on any street or other railroad therein, if any such there are, and shall pray for a judgment by the court declaring the ordinance valid, legal, and binding and that the liens be set up as alleged. It shall not be necessary in such petition to allege the names of the owners of the abutting property or railroads to be affected, but it shall be sufficient to describe the street or portion thereof to be improved and to indicate that the property on the street is to be charged with the expense.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 16; Code 1933, § 69-428.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Carter v. City of Toccoa, 210 Ga. 167, 78 S.E.2d 487 (1953).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 70C Am. Jur. 2d, Special or Local Assessments, §§ 172, 175.

C.J.S. - 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1526, 1726 et seq.

36-39-29. Order to show cause on petition; time and notice of hearing.

Statute text

At or before the filing of the petition provided for in Code Section 36-39-28, the same shall be presented to the judge of the superior court, who shall thereupon enter an order calling upon all persons owning or interested in the real estate abutting on the street or on the designated part thereof to show cause, at a time and place to be named in the order, why the prayer of the petition should not be granted, the ordinance and assessments not declared valid, and the liens not be fixed as legal and binding. The hearing shall be not less than 30 nor more than 60 days after the entry of the order and shall be either in open court or at chambers. It shall be the duty of the clerk to publish once a week for four weeks, in the official newspaper of the county, a statement of the case and a copy of the order.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 16; Code 1933, § 69-429.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Motions, Rules, and Orders, § 46.

C.J.S. - 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1728.

36-39-30. Conduct of hearing; issuance of order by court.

Statute text

At the time and place named or at such other time and place as the hearing may be adjourned to, any interested person shall be heard to show cause in writing, which writing shall be filed with the clerk, why the prayer of the petition should not be granted. The court shall hear all questions of law or fact and all competent evidence may be offered as in other cases. The court shall thereupon enter an appropriate order finding and adjudging that the ordinance is lawful and valid and that the liens are legal and binding, or otherwise, as the law and facts may warrant.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 16; Code 1933, § 69-430.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Motions, Rules, and Orders, § 46.

36-39-31. Appeal from judgment of court.

Statute text

The municipal corporation or any person appearing who is dissatisfied with the judgment may appeal to the Court of Appeals, as provided in Title 5.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 16; Code 1933, § 69-431.)

36-39-32. Conclusiveness of superior court's final judgment.

Statute text

If the final judgment of the superior court is in favor of the validity of the ordinance and of the liens claimed, the same shall forever be conclusive, and the matters so determined shall never thereafter be drawn in question in any court.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 16; Code 1933, § 69-432.)

36-39-33. Entry of reference to judgment on bonds following validation; use of entry as evidence.

Statute text

Bonds issued under this chapter after the judgment of the superior court shall have written or stamped thereon the words "Validated and confirmed by judgment of the superior court," specifying also the date when the judgment was rendered and the court in which it was rendered and shall be signed by the clerk of the superior court. Such entry shall be original prima-facie evidence of the fact of the judgment and shall be receivable as such in any court of this state.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 16; Code 1933, § 69-433.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 294 et seq.

36-39-34. Construction of chapter.

Statute text

This chapter shall not be construed to repeal any special or local law or to affect any proceedings under such law for the making of improvements authorized in this chapter or for raising the funds therefor but shall be deemed to be additional and independent legislation for such purposes, to provide an alternative method of procedure for such purposes, and to be a complete law not subject to any limitations or restrictions contained in any other public or private law or laws except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1927, p. 321, § 14; Code 1933, § 69-426.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Constitutionality. - This section is not violative of Ga. Const. 1877, Art. I, Sec. IV, Para. I (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. IV). Wheat v. City of Bainbridge, 168 Ga. 479, 148 S.E. 332 (1928).

——————————

CHAPTER 40

GRANTS OF STATE FUNDS TO MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS

Article 1

General Provisions.

36-40-1. Grants for repairs on facilities of historical value.

Article 2

Grants for Public Purposes.

36-40-20. Legislative intent.

36-40-21. "Municipal corporation" defined.

36-40-22. Certificate of eligibility for grant generally; submission; form; execution and attestation; penalty for signing false certificate.

36-40-23. When certificate to be filed; effect of failure to file certificate.

36-40-24. Computation of allocation of funds.

36-40-25. Payment and use of funds.

Article 3

Grants for Purchase and

Construction of Capital

Outlay Items.

36-40-40. "Municipal corporation" defined.

36-40-41. Grants of state funds for capital outlay items generally.

36-40-42. Certificate of eligibility for grant; submission; form; execution and attestation; penalty for signing false certificate.

36-40-43. When certificate to be filed; effect of failure to file certificate.

36-40-44. Computation of allocation of funds.

36-40-45. Payment and use of funds.

36-40-46. Submission of annual audit; adjustment of fund distribution; effect of failure to submit audit; procedure when municipal corporation has no annual audit.

——————————

ARTICLE 1

GENERAL PROVISIONS

36-40-1. Grants for repairs on facilities of historical value.

Statute text

(a) In addition to any grant to which any municipal corporation of this state is entitled under Article 2 of this chapter in any fiscal year, and any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, any such municipal corporation which owns and maintains from local revenues a public facility which is found and declared by a resolution of the General Assembly to be of historical value to the state and which is in need of repairs which are reasonably estimated to cost in excess of $5 million and to require more than one year to plan and complete shall be authorized to receive an annual grant equal to one-fourth of the amount of local funds expended on or committed to such repairs by the governing body of such municipal corporation. The funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the purposes of this Code section shall be appropriated separately from funds appropriated for the purposes of Code Section 36-40-24.

(b) Funds made available under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be distributed in the same manner as other funds are distributed under Article 2 of this chapter. The certificate required by Code Section 36-40-22 shall include a statement of the amount of the annual grant under subsection (a) of this Code section, the total amount of local funds expended on or committed to the repairs specified in subsection (a) of this Code section as of the date of the certificate, and the total amount of grant funds under subsection (a) of this Code section already distributed to the municipal corporation under Article 2 of this chapter.

(c) No municipal corporation shall receive any grant under this Code section for a facility which was not found and declared eligible under subsection (a) of this Code section by April 24, 1977.

History

(Ga. L. 1975, p. 1006, §§ 1, 3, 3A; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Powers and duties of Department of Natural Resources relating to historic preservation, promotion, § 12-3-50 et seq.

——————————

ARTICLE 2

GRANTS FOR PUBLIC PURPOSES

36-40-20. Legislative intent.

Statute text

It is declared to be the purpose and intent of the General Assembly that state funds be made available to the governing bodies of certain municipal corporations of this state to be expended for any public purposes, except for the purpose of paying the salaries of elected municipal corporation officers.

History

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 889, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Bituminous Cas. Corp. v. R.D.C., Inc., 334 F. Supp. 1163 (N.D. Ga. 1971).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Eligibility of municipalities to share in funds. - All incorporated municipalities appearing in the 1970 United States census would be eligible to share in the distribution of the second half of funds appropriated for fiscal year 1970-71 regardless of whether the municipalities were eligible prior to that time. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-62.

Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services must make two fund computations during census years. - Only manner in which the State Treasurer (now director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services) can compute grants to municipalities for the fiscal year 1970-71 is to make two separate computations and two separate payments of funds; one-half of available funds should be distributed to the respective municipalities based on population according to the 1960 decennial United States census; after the 1970 decennial United States census becomes effective for the purpose of affecting Georgia law (December 31, 1970), the State Treasurer (now director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services) should make computations based on the 1970 census and distribute the remaining half of money appropriated for fiscal 1970-71. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-36.

Municipalities may use funds granted for any public purpose other than paying salaries of elected municipal officers. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-171.

36-40-21. "Municipal corporation" defined.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term "municipal corporation" means a municipal corporation whose population shall be based on the current United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census, the governing body of which has held at least six regular meetings within the 12 months preceding the execution of the certificate required by Code Section 36-40-22 and which for a period of one year has levied and collected an ad valorem tax on the real property in such municipal corporation or which has, for such one-year period, performed at least two of the following municipal activities and services:

(1) Furnished water service;

(2) Furnished sewerage service;

(3) Furnished garbage collection;

(4) Furnished police protection;

(5) Furnished fire protection;

(6) Assessed and collected business licenses; or

(7) Furnished municipal street-lighting facilities.

History

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 889, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Mayor of Hapeville v. Anderson, 246 Ga. 786, 272 S.E.2d 713 (1980).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Eligibility of municipalities to share in funds. - All incorporated municipalities appearing in the 1970 United States census would be eligible to share in the distribution of the second half of funds appropriated for fiscal year 1970-71 regardless of whether the municipalities were eligible prior to that time. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-62.

Municipality must have been incorporated and listed in United States decennial census in order to qualify for municipal grant. 1967 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 67-353.

Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services must make two fund computations during census year. - Only manner in which the State Treasurer (now director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services) can compute grants to municipalities for the fiscal year 1970-71 is to make two separate computations and two separate payments of funds; one-half of available funds should be distributed to the respective municipalities based on population according to the 1960 decennial United States census. After the 1970 decennial United States census becomes effective for the purpose of affecting Georgia law (December 31, 1970), the State Treasurer (now director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services) should make computations based on the 1970 census and distribute the remaining half of money appropriated for fiscal 1970-71. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-36.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 1, 13, 96.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1 et seq.

36-40-22. Certificate of eligibility for grant generally; submission; form; execution and attestation; penalty for signing false certificate.

Statute text

(a) Each municipal corporation, as defined in Code Section 36-40-21, shall submit to the Office of the State Treasurer a certificate showing the number of regular meetings held within the preceding 12 months by the governing body of the municipal corporation and stating that ad valorem taxes on real property were levied and collected in such municipal corporation within the 12 months preceding such certificate or stating that the municipal corporation performed at least two of the activities and services enumerated in Code Section 36-40-21.

(b) Such certificate shall be substantially in the following form:

CERTIFICATE

"The undersigned, Mayor (Chairman of the Commission) of (Official Corporate Name), does hereby certify that ____ regular meetings of the governing body were held during the past 12 months and that ad valorem taxes were levied and collected during the past 12 months for the operation of the government of (Official Corporate Name) or that the municipal corporation performed the following two services:

_____________________________________________________________________ and

_________________________________________________________________________.

The municipal treasurer or other official or officials authorized to receive municipal funds is (are)

________________________________________________.

__________________________ __________________________________________

Date Mayor (Chairman of Commission)

Attest:

__________________________

Clerk"

(c) Such certificate shall be executed by the highest elective official, whether designated as mayor or by some other term (or as chairman of the commission in those municipal corporations having a commission form of government), and shall be attested by the clerk. The name of the municipal corporation used in the certificate shall be its official corporate name. The name of the municipal treasurer or other official or officials authorized to receive municipal funds shall be listed in the certificate and the instrument transferring funds to the municipal corporation shall be payable to such treasurer or other official or officials as listed in the certificate.

(d) The information contained in the certificate shall constitute the basis upon which the Office of the State Treasurer shall make the distribution of funds under this article.

(e) Any person willfully and knowingly signing a certificate containing false information shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 889, § 4; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Eligibility of municipalities to share in funds. - All incorporated municipalities appearing in the 1970 United States census would be eligible to share in the distribution of the second half of funds appropriated for fiscal year 1970-71 regardless of whether the municipalities were eligible prior to that time. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-62.

State treasurer must make two fund computations during census year. - Only manner in which the state treasurer can compute grants to municipalities for the fiscal year 1970-71 is to make two separate computations and two separate payments of funds; one-half of available funds should be distributed to the respective municipalities based on population according to the 1960 decennial United States census. After the 1970 decennial United States census becomes effective for the purpose of affecting Georgia law (December 31, 1970), the state treasurer should make computations based on the 1970 census and distribute the remaining half of money appropriated for fiscal 1970-71. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-36.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 522 et seq.

36-40-23. When certificate to be filed; effect of failure to file certificate.

Statute text

Prior to June 1 of each year, a certificate shall be filed which shall be the basis upon which payments shall be made of funds made available under this article for the immediately succeeding fiscal year beginning July 1 and ending June 30. If no certificate is filed within such time limitation in this Code section, the municipality shall not be entitled to and shall not be paid any funds for the applicable period and such municipality shall not be included in the formula for determining the amount of the grants as provided in Code Section 36-40-24.

History

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 889, § 5.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1967, p. 889, § 5, the basis for this Code section, was amended by Ga. L. 1982, p. 869, § 1, (effective April 13, 1982), which added a new paragraph to the end of that section of the 1967 Act, providing for the filing of a late certification by any eligible municipality which failed to file for Fiscal Year 1982 funds or which filed after the June 1 cutoff date. Section 2 of the 1982 Act provided for the repeal of the 1982 Act effective November 1, 1982.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Eligibility of municipalities to share in funds. - All incorporated municipalities appearing in the 1970 United States census would be eligible to share in the distribution of the second half of funds appropriated for fiscal year 1970-71 regardless of whether the municipalities were eligible prior to that time. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-62.

Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services must make two fund computations during census year. - Only manner in which the State Treasurer (now director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services) can compute grants to municipalities for the fiscal year 1970-71 is to make two separate computations and two separate payments of funds; one-half of available funds should be distributed to the respective municipalities based on population according to the 1960 decennial United States census. After the 1970 decennial United States census becomes effective for the purpose of affecting Georgia law (December 31, 1970), the State Treasurer (now director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services) should make computations based on the 1970 census and distribute the remaining half of money appropriated for fiscal 1970-71. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-36.

36-40-24. Computation of allocation of funds.

Statute text

(a) To the extent that funds are made available by any law, for the purposes set out in Code Section 36-40-20, the Office of the State Treasurer is authorized and directed to grant such funds to the municipal corporations of this state, as defined in Code Section 36-40-21, on the following basis:

(1) The total amount of the grant shall be divided by the total population of all municipal corporations, to arrive at an average per capita amount. Such per capita amount shall be multiplied in turn by the population of each municipal corporation with a population of 10,000 or less to arrive at the respective grants of such municipal corporations. Such grants shall be referred to as "paragraph (1) grants."

(2) In addition to the amount it would receive under paragraph (1) grants, each municipal corporation with a population under 5,000 shall receive an additional grant equal to 50 percent of the amount it received as a paragraph (1) grant. Such grants shall be referred to as "paragraph (2) grants."

(3) In addition to the amount it would receive under paragraph (1) grants, each municipal corporation with a population of not less than 5,000 and not more than 10,000 shall receive an additional grant equal to 25 percent of the amount it received as paragraph (1) grants. Such grants shall be referred to as "paragraph (3) grants."

(4) The amount remaining for distribution after deducting the total amounts of paragraph (1) grants, paragraph (2) grants, and paragraph (3) grants shall then be divided by the total population of all remaining municipal corporations (eliminating those receiving paragraph (1), paragraph (2), and paragraph (3) grants), to arrive at a per capita amount for such remaining municipal corporations. The per capita amount as so determined shall then be multiplied by the population of each such remaining municipal corporation to arrive at its respective grant. Such grants shall be referred to as "paragraph (4) grants."

(b) No municipal corporation which qualifies for state grants under this article shall receive less than $500.00 per annum.

(c) Whenever the term "population" is used in this article, it means population as determined according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census.

(d) The computation of individual municipal grants as called for in this article shall be prepared and certified by the Office of the State Treasurer, which shall make payments as called for in this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 889, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Bituminous Cas. Corp. v. R.D.C., Inc., 334 F. Supp. 1163 (N.D. Ga. 1971).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Eligibility of municipalities to share in funds. - All incorporated municipalities appearing in the 1970 United States census would be eligible to share in the distribution of the second half of funds appropriated for fiscal year 1970-71 regardless of whether the municipalities were eligible prior to that time. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-62.

Minimum amount to be received. - Municipality which was not eligible under the 1960 United States census, but which is eligible under the 1970 United States census, should receive at least $250.00 regardless of the application of the formula. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-62.

State treasurer must make two fund computations during census year. - Only manner in which the state treasurer can compute grants to municipalities for the fiscal year 1970-71 is to make two separate computations and two separate payments of funds; one-half of available funds should be distributed to the respective municipalities based on population according to the 1960 decennial United States census. After the 1970 decennial United States census becomes effective for the purpose of affecting Georgia law (December 31, 1970), the state treasurer should make computations based on the 1970 census and distribute the remaining half of money appropriated for fiscal 1970-71. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-36.

36-40-25. Payment and use of funds.

Statute text

Funds distributed under this article shall be paid to the municipal corporation in the name of the municipal treasurer or other official or officials authorized to receive municipal funds, as listed in the certificate required by Code Section 36-40-22. Funds granted under Code Section 36-40-24 shall be expended by the municipal corporation only for the purposes prescribed in Code Section 36-40-20.

History

(Ga. L. 1967, p. 889, § 6; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1006, § 2.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Eligibility of municipalities to share in funds. - All incorporated municipalities appearing in the 1970 United States census would be eligible to share in the distribution of the second half of funds appropriated for fiscal year 1970-71 regardless of whether the municipalities were eligible prior to that time. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-62.

Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services must make two fund computations during census year. - Only manner in which the State Treasurer (now director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services) can compute grants to municipalities for the fiscal year 1970-71 is to make two separate computations and two separate payments of funds; one-half of available funds should be distributed to the respective municipalities based on population according to the 1960 decennial United States census. After the 1970 decennial United States census becomes effective for the purpose of affecting Georgia law (December 31, 1970), the State Treasurer (now director of the Office of Treasury and Fiscal Services) should make computations based on the 1970 census and distribute the remaining half of money appropriated for fiscal 1970-71. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-36.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 81A C.J.S., States, § 404 et seq.

——————————

ARTICLE 3

GRANTS FOR PURCHASE AND CONSTRUCTION OF CAPITAL OUTLAY ITEMS

36-40-40. "Municipal corporation" defined.

Statute text

The term "municipal corporation," as used in this article, means a municipal corporation, the population of which is based on the current United States decennial census, the governing body of which has held at least six regular meetings within the 12 months preceding the execution of the certificate required by Code Section 36-40-42, and which has levied taxes or levied fees of any type for the operation of the government of the municipal corporation or which has received a franchise tax from any utility, firm, or corporation within the 12 months preceding the execution of the certificate required by Code Section 36-40-42.

History

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 458, § 3.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Mayor of Hapeville v. Anderson, 246 Ga. 786, 272 S.E.2d 713 (1980).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Reference to "the current United States decennial census" is a reference to the population of an otherwise qualifying incorporated municipality based on the population of that municipality as it existed at the last decennial census in 1960. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-210.

Municipality must have been incorporated and listed in United States decennial census in order to qualify for a municipal grant. 1967 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 67-353.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 1, 13.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1 et seq.

36-40-41. Grants of state funds for capital outlay items generally.

Statute text

Pursuant to Article VII, Section III, Paragraph III of the Constitution of Georgia, relating to the granting of state funds to municipal corporations, such funds are authorized to be granted to certain municipal corporations as provided for in this article and may be used by such municipal corporations for purchasing, constructing, improving, maintaining, and repairing capital outlay items. Any funds granted to municipal corporations pursuant to the aforesaid provision of the Constitution shall be used only for the purposes provided for in this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 458, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 882, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Legislative intent. - General Assembly intended to aid qualifying municipalities to fulfill the municipalities' responsibility to provide a system of roads and streets and to aid the municipalities in providing traffic control. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-40.

Construction of section. - This section should be strictly construed, but construed in pari materia with prior acts and amendments authorizing grants to municipalities. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-40.

Funds received by municipalities must be used for "devices and equipment" which have as their primary function direct control of traffic or else provide a direct accommodation to the general flow of traffic. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-40.

Municipalities may expend funds granted under this section only for purchase, construction, improvement, maintenance, and repair of capital outlay items. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-171.

Determining what are traffic control devices. - General Assembly by the language of this section intended to confer upon the municipalities qualifying under this section some latitude in determining what are "traffic control devices and equipment to control and accommodate the flow of traffic"; however, such latitude is not completely discretionary without limitations. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-40.

What are activities incident to providing road system. - To construct and maintain a system of public roads, streets, sidewalks, bridges and appurtenances, and to provide traffic control devices and equipment to control and accommodate the flow of traffic therein would be "activities incident to providing and maintaining an adequate system of public roads and bridges in this State" under the provisions of Ga. Const. 1945, Art. VII, Sec. IX, Para. IV (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IX, Para VI(b)). This section declares the same within its latitude. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-40.

Term "capital outlay items," as used in this law, would include any expenditure on behalf of municipalities for long-term additions or betterments properly chargeable to a capital asset account. 1970 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 70-171.

Investment not restricted. - General Assembly intended funds granted to municipalities to be special funds and did not intend to restrict the funds so as to prohibit the funds' temporary investment so long as the investment does not interfere in any way with the expedient use of the funds for the purpose provided in the act, and the maturity date of the government obligations does not extend beyond the date when such funds shall be needed for these purposes. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-35.

Use of word "shall" permissive as to question of temporary investment of funds. - Limitation imposed by this section authorizing grants was intended by the legislature to be a limitation on the final use of these funds and the word "shall" as used in the section should be interpreted as permissive or directory when the question of temporary investment of these funds is considered. Certainly no right or benefit is lost by taking this interpretation; but to the contrary, the benefit of capital earnings is lost if this interpretation is not taken. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-35.

Legitimacy of expenses for street lights. - When street lights are installed or rented primarily to directly control or accommodate the general flow of traffic, the expenses for such installation or rental would be legitimate expenses under this section. However, when street lights are installed or rented as a general city improvement or as a measure to control crime, expenses of installation or renting would not be qualified expenditures. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-40.
